Utah statutes.
17B-2a-702.   Provisions applicable to mosquito abatement districts.
(1)  Each mosquito abatement district is governed by and has the powers stated
in:
(a)  this part; and
(b)  Chapter 1, Provisions Applicable to All Local Districts.
(2)  This part applies only to mosquito abatement districts.
(3)  A mosquito abatement district is not subject to the provisions of any
other part of this chapter.
(4)  If there is a conflict between a provision in Chapter 1, Provisions
Applicable to All Local Districts, and a provision in this part, the provision
in this part governs.
